Hawaii, session 2026, HB1321.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 107-28, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§107-28  County authority to [amend and] adopt the Hawaii state building codes without council approval.  (a)  The governing body of each county shall [amend,] adopt[, and update] the Hawaii state building codes as they apply within their respective jurisdiction, in accordance with section 46-1.5(13), without approval of the council.  Each county shall [amend and] adopt the Hawaii state building codes and standards listed in section 107-25, as the referenced Hawaii state building codes and standards for its respective county building code ordinance, no later than [two years] one year after the adoption of the Hawaii state building codes. (b) If a county does not [amend] adopt the Hawaii state building codes within the [two-year] one-year time frame, the Hawaii state building codes shall become applicable as [an interim] county building code. (c)  A county with a population in excess of 500,000 may amend its building energy conservation code to require more stringent energy-saving performance than the Hawaii state building codes and standards listed in section 107-25." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________